District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.03

Number of directors.

(a)

A board of directors shall consist of 3 or more directors, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(b)

The number of directors may be increased or decreased, but to no fewer than 3, by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History